Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.1242

School safety and security staff—Agreements with law enforcement agencies or security guard companies.

(1)(a) If a law enforcement agency or security guard company supplies safety and security staff to work on school property when students are expected to be present, the school district must annually review and adopt an agreement with the law enforcement agency or security guard company that meets the requirements of this section. The agreement must:

(i) Meet the requirements described in RCW 28A.320.124(1);

(ii) Include a jointly determined hiring and placement process and a performance evaluation process; and

(iii) Either confirm that the safety and security staff have training series documentation provided under RCW 28A.310.515(4) or describe the plan for safety and security staff to complete the training series described in RCW 28A.400.345(2).

(b) The agreement review and adoption process must involve parents, students, and community members.

(2) For purposes of this section, "safety and security staff" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.320.124.

[ 2021 c 38 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 38: See note following RCW 28A.400.345.